District of Columbia statutes.
44-661.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Department” means the Department of Health Care Finance.

(2)

“Hospital” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 44-501(a)(1), but excludes any hospital operated by the federal government.

(3)

“Hospital system” means any group of hospitals licensed separately, but operated, owned, or maintained by a common entity.

(4)

“Medicaid” means the medical assistance programs authorized by Title XIX of the Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 343; 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), and by § 1-307.02, and administered by the Department.

(5)

“Outpatient gross patient revenue” means the amount calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles for hospitals that is reported as the sum of Lines 18 and 19; Column 2; Worksheet G-2 of the Hospital and Hospital Health Care Complex Cost Report (Form CMS 2552-10), filed for the period ending between October 1, 2012, and June 30, 2013.

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5062, 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) addition of this chapter, see §§ 5062-5070 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).